Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.570

Postretirement employment—Reduction or suspension of pension payments.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1936.SL) ***

(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.

(2) Any retired teacher or retired administrator who enters service in any public educational institution in Washington state at least one calendar month after his or her accrual date shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, after the retiree has rendered service for more than eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a school year.

(3)(a) Between March 23, 2022, and July 1, 2025, a retiree who reenters employment more than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, and who enters service in a school district in a nonadministrative position shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a school year.

(b) Between March 23, 2022, and July 1, 2025, a retiree that retired before January 1, 2022, and who enters service in a second-class school district, as defined in RCW 28A.300.065, as either a district superintendent or an in-school administrator shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a school year.

(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the use of this section for the select committee on pension policy.

(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than five hundred twenty-five hours per year without a reduction of his or her pension.

[ 2022 c 110 s 1; 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 10; 2007 c 50 s 3; 2003 c 295 s 6. Prior: 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 3; (2001 c 317 s 1 repealed by 2003 c 412 s 3); 1999 c 387 s 1; 1997 c 254 s 5; 1995 c 264 s 1; 1994 c 69 s 2; 1989 c 273 s 29; 1986 c 237 s 1; 1967 c 151 s 5; 1959 c 37 s 3; 1955 c 274 s 30; 1947 c 80 s 57; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-76.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 110: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 23, 2022]." [ 2022 c 110 s 7.]

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 10: See note following RCW 41.40.037.

Intent—Construction—Application—1997 c 254: See notes following RCW 41.26.490.

Effective date—1995 c 264: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 5, 1995]." [ 1995 c 264 s 2.]

Findings—1994 c 69: "The legislature finds that there is a shortage of certificated substitute teachers in many regions of the state, and that this shortage will likely increase in the coming years. The legislature further finds that one method of reducing this shortage of substitute teachers is to encourage retired teachers to serve as substitutes by increasing the number of days they can work without affecting their retirement payments." [ 1994 c 69 s 1.]

Effective date—Severability—1967 c 151: See notes following RCW 41.32.480.

Contract rights of retirees hired for postretirement employment: RCW 28A.405.900.